Rhode Island, session 2025, SB751.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 23-28.36-1, 23-28.36-2 and 23-28.36-4 of the General Laws in
Chapter 23-28.36 entitled "Notification of Fire Fighters, Police Officers and Emergency Medical
Technicians After Exposure to Infectious Diseases" are hereby amended to read as follows:
23-28.36-1. Legislative findings.
The general assembly finds and declares that by reason of their employment, fire fighters,
police officers, and emergency medical technicians are required to work in the midst of, and are
subject to, exposure to infectious diseases, including, but not limited to, human immunodeficiency
virus (HIV), hepatitis B virus (HBV), and hepatitis C virus (HCV), and coronavirus disease 2019
(COVID-19); that after exposure, fire fighters, police officers, and emergency medical technicians
are not informed of the exposures; that fire fighters, police officers, and emergency medical
technicians so exposed can potentially and unwittingly expose coworkers, families, and members
of the public to infectious diseases. The general assembly further finds and declares that all the
aforementioned conditions exist and arise out of or in the course of employment.
23-28.36-2. Definitions.
The following terms when used in this chapter shall have the following meanings herein
ascribed:
(1) “Contagious disease” means an infectious disease.
(2) “Disability” means a condition of physical incapacity to perform any assigned duty or

duties in the fire department or emergency medical service.
(3) “Emergency medical technician” means a person licensed pursuant to chapter 4.1 of
this title to provide emergency medical services.
(4) “Fire department” means service groups (paid or volunteer) that are organized and
trained for the prevention and control of loss of life and property from fire or other emergency.
(5) “Fire fighter” means an individual who is assigned to fire fighting activity and is
required to respond to alarms and perform emergency action at the location of a fire, hazardous
materials, or other emergency incident.
(6) “Infectious disease” means interruption, cessation, or disorder of body functions,
systems, or organs transmissible by association with the sick or their secretions or excretions,
excluding the common cold. Infectious disease includes, but is not limited to, human
immunodeficiency virus (HIV), hepatitis B virus (HBV), and hepatitis C virus (HCV), and
coronavirus disease 2019 (COVID-19).
(7) “Licensed facility” means a hospital, nursing home, dialysis center, physician’s office
operatory, or the like, as may be licensed by the state to provide medical care.
(8) “Police officer” means any permanently employed city or town police officer, state
police officer, committing squad member, or other permanent law enforcement officer as defined
in § 12-7-21; provided, however, this shall not include the highest ranking officer of any of the
departments.
(9) “Strike force member” means any member of the statewide strike force of the
department of attorney general.
23-28.36-4. Occupational disability for fire fighters. Occupational disability of fire
fighters, police officers and emergency medical technicians.
Any active fire fighter or, police officer or emergency medical technician who is unable to
perform his or her duties in his or her department by reason of exposure to infectious disease as
defined in § 23-28.36-2, which infectious disease develops or manifests itself as a result of the
exposure during a period while the fire fighter or, police officer or emergency medical technician
is in the service of the department, shall be entitled to receive an occupational disability, and he or
she shall be entitled to all of the benefits provided for in chapter 19 of title 45 chapters 19, 21 and
21.2 of title 45, as applicable, and chapter 10 of title 36, as applicable if the fire fighter, police
officer or emergency medical technician is employed by the state.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000902
========
LC000902 - Page 2 of 3